Georgia, session 2025_26, HB276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to income taxes,
is amended in Code Section 48-7-1, relating to definitions regarding such taxes, by revising
paragraph (1) as follows:
"(1) 'Corporation' includes, but is not limited to, all associations, professional
associations organized pursuant to Chapter 10 of Title 14, and insurance companies."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
H. B. 276
- 1 -

LC 50 1023
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 276
- 2 -